Florida, session 2026, HB407.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Connecting to
Care Act."
Section 2. Subsections (6) and (7) of section 397.427,
Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
397.427 Medication-assisted treatment service providers;
rehabilitation program; needs assessment and provision of
services; persons authorized to issue takeout medication;
unlawful operation; penalty.—
(6) A physician assistant, a registered nurse, an advanced
practice registered nurse, or a licensed practical nurse, or a
pharmacist working for a licensed service provider may deliver
medication as prescribed by rule if:
(a) The service provider is authorized to provide
medication-assisted treatment;
(b) The medication has been administered pursuant to a
valid prescription written by the program's physician who is
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb407-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 407 2026
licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459; and
(c) The medication ordered appears on a formulary or meets
federal requirements for medication-assisted treatment.
(7) Each licensed service provider that provides
medication-assisted treatment must adopt written protocols as
specified by the department and in accordance with federally
required rules, regulations, or procedures. The protocol shall
provide for the supervision of the physician assistant,
registered nurse, advanced practice registered nurse, or
licensed practical nurse working under the supervision of, or a
pharmacist acting pursuant to s. 465.1893 under an established
protocol with, a physician who is licensed under chapter 458 or
chapter 459. The protocol must specify how the medication will
be used in conjunction with counseling or psychosocial treatment
and that the services provided will be included on the treatment
plan. The protocol must specify the procedures by which
medication-assisted treatment may be administered by the
physician assistant, registered nurse, advanced practice
registered nurse, or licensed practical nurse, or pharmacist.
These protocols shall be signed by the supervising physician and
the administering physician assistant, registered nurse,
advanced practice registered nurse, or licensed practical nurse,
or pharmacist.
Section 3. Section 465.1893, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb407-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 407 2026
465.1893 Administration of antipsychotic medication and
medication for the treatment of opiate addiction by injection.—
(1)(a) A pharmacist, at the direction of a physician
licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459, may administer a
long-acting antipsychotic medication or medication for the
treatment of opiate addiction approved by the United States Food
and Drug Administration by injection to a patient if the
pharmacist:
1. Is authorized by and acting within the framework of an
established protocol with the prescribing physician.
2. Practices at a facility that accommodates privacy for
nondeltoid injections and conforms with state rules and
regulations regarding the appropriate and safe disposal of
medication and medical waste.
3. Has completed the course required under subsection (2).
(b) A separate prescription from a physician is required
for each injection administered by a pharmacist under this
subsection.
(2)(a) A pharmacist seeking to administer a long-acting
antipsychotic medication or medication for the treatment of
opiate addiction by injection must complete an 8-hour continuing
education course offered by:
1. A statewide professional association of physicians in
this state accredited to provide educational activities
designated for the American Medical Association Physician's
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb407-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 407 2026
Recognition Award (AMA PRA) Category 1 Credit or the American
Osteopathic Association (AOA) Category 1-A continuing medical
education (CME) credit; and
2. A statewide association of pharmacists.
(b) The course may be offered in a distance learning
format and must be included in the 30 hours of continuing
professional pharmaceutical education required under s.
465.009(1). The course shall have a curriculum of instruction
that concerns the safe and effective administration of
behavioral health and antipsychotic medications or medications
for the treatment of opiate addiction by injection, as
applicable, including, but not limited to, potential allergic
reactions to such medications.
Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb407-00